Utah statutes.
32B-13-201.   Commission's power to issue beer wholesaling license.

(1) (a)  Before a person may purchase, store, sell, offer for sale, distribute, or import beer to a person who sells at retail or acts in any way as a beer wholesaler, the person shall first obtain a beer wholesaling license issued by the commission in accordance with this chapter.

(b)  A violation of Subsection (1)(a) is a class A misdemeanor.

(2) (a)  The commission may issue a beer wholesaling license for the purchase, storage, sale, distribution, transportation, and import of beer.

(b)  A beer wholesaling license entitles the beer wholesaler licensee to:

(i)  purchase and import beer into the state;

(ii)  store beer in an approved warehouse; and

(iii)  sell and distribute beer directly to:

(A)  a beer retailer; or

(B)  an event permittee.

(3)  Nothing in this section precludes a small brewer from selling beer the small brewer manufactures directly to:

(a)  a retail licensee;

(b)  an off-premise beer retailer; or

(c)  an event permittee.

